Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.687

Expenses incurred by receiver.

All expenses incurred by the receiver in relation to the receivership of a credit union, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorneys' fees, become a first charge upon the assets of the credit union. The charges shall be fixed and determined by the receiver, subject to the approval of the court.

[ 1997 c 397 s 75.]